Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Procedure for Small Claims

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Small claims: jurisdictional limits as binding on appellate court, 67 ALR4th 1117.

Jury trial rights in, and on appeal from, small claims court proceeding, 70 ALR4th 1119.

§ 1-21-201.
Procedure generally; jurisdiction extended.

In the trial of civil cases before any circuit court in which the amount claimed, exclusive of costs, does not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000.00), the procedure is as defined in W.S.

1-21-201

through

1-21-205

. The department of revenue may consolidate claims for collection of taxes against a single taxpayer into a single case under the procedures in W.S.

1-21-201

through

1-21-205

subject to specified dollar limitations.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 30, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 14-1101; W.S. 1957, § 1-562; Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 29; 1973, ch. 216, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-22-201

; Laws 1980, ch. 39, § 1; 1989, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 257, § 1; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 1997, ch. 43, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 189, § 1; 2011, ch. 196, § 1; 2017 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42,§ 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” for “three thousand dollars ($3,000.00).”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “six thousand dollars ($6,000.00)” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “the procedure is” for “the procedure and costs are” in the first sentence.

Appellate jurisdiction assigned to district court. —

Actions for small claims are no different, other than the informal procedure, from any other civil actions triable in county courts or justice of the peace courts, and it follows that appellate jurisdiction is assigned to the district court within the same county. Johnson v. Statewide Collections, 778 P.2d 93,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1989).

Applied

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Justice Court No. Two, 529 P.2d 977,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 1-21-202.
Commencement of actions; remedy cumulative; continuance to obtain
attorney; docketing.

Actions may be commenced, heard and determined under W.S.

1-21-201

through

1-21-205

if the state, any governmental entity, any natural person, corporation, partnership, association or other organization appears before any circuit court and executes an affidavit reciting the full address of the defendant, the nature of the claim, the amount due and stating that demand has been made and payment refused. The remedy provided by this article is cumulative and not exclusive.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 33 of the Wyoming Statutes, in small claims court, the state, governmental entities, natural persons, corporations, partnerships, associations or other organizations may litigate actions on behalf of themselves in person or through authorized employees, with or without an attorney, provided that if an attorney appears, the opposing party is entitled to a continuance for the purpose of obtaining an attorney of its own.

The circuit judge shall docket the case as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 30, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 14-1102; W.S. 1957, § 1-563; Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 30; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-22-202

; Laws 1983, ch. 75, § 1; 1991, ch. 46, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2017 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “justice of the peace or” preceding “circuit judge”; and in (c) deleted “justice or” preceding “circuit judge.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which read: “The plaintiff shall deposit an appearance fee of four dollars ($4.00) which shall be retained by the court as costs and taxed to the party against whom judgment is rendered.”

Construction. —

The statute only requires that a demand for payment of a small claim have been made and refused. Van Riper v. Odekoven, 2001 WY 58, 26 P.3d 325,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. July 17, 2001).

Cited

in

Near v. Casto, 613 P.2d 577,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 1-21-203.
Affidavit of claim; service of summons; venue jurisdiction.

The claimant shall prepare the affidavit as set forth. When the affidavit is executed by the claimant the court shall file the same and have summons served on the defendant in the manner provided by law or, if the defendant resides in the state, service may be made by the court by certified mail addressed to the defendant at his address within the state with return receipt requested. Upon receipt by the circuit judge of the return receipt signed by the defendant or his agent, service is complete.

Venue provisions in W.S. 1-5-104(b) and

1-5-105

through

1-5-109

apply to actions commenced under this article.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 30, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 14-1103; W.S. 1957, § 1-564; Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 31; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-22-203

; Laws 1991, ch. 46, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2008, ch. 27, § 1; 2021 ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice or” preceding “circuit judge” twice in (a).

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “or at his request the circuit judge shall draft it for him” at the end of the first sentence of (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 27, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), deleted "at any location in the county" preceding "in the manner," substituted "state" for "county" twice; and added "1-5-104(b) and" in (b).

§ 1-21-204.
Time for appearance.

The date of appearance of the defendant as provided in the summons shall be not more than twenty (20) days nor less than twelve (12) days from the date of service of the summons. When the circuit judge has fixed the date for the appearance of the defendant he shall inform the plaintiff of the date and at the same time order the plaintiff to appear with such books, papers and witnesses as necessary to prove his claim.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 30, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 14-1104; W.S. 1957, § 1-565; Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 32; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-204; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2021 ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice or” preceding “circuit judge.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted "twenty (20)" for "twelve (12)" following "more than" and "twelve (12)" for "three (3)" following "less than."

§ 1-21-205.
Pleading
and hearing; execution.

At any hearing the plaintiff
and defendant and their witnesses may offer evidence. No formal pleading
other than the claim and notice is necessary. The hearing and disposition
of the hearing shall be informal. No prejudgment attachment or garnishment
shall issue, but execution, including post judgment garnishment in
aid of execution, may issue as prescribed by law for circuit court.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 30, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 14-1106; W.S. 1957, § 1-567; Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 34; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-205; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice or” preceding “circuit court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.